Washington statutes.
RCW 19.110.040

Application of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter applies to:

(1) A radio station, television station, publisher, printer, or distributor of a newspaper, magazine, billboard, or other advertising medium which accepts advertising in good faith without knowledge of its violation of any provision of this chapter;

(2) A franchise subject to the provisions of chapter 19.100 RCW;

(3) A security subject to the provisions of chapter 21.20 RCW;

(4) A newspaper distribution system;

(5) The sale, lease, or transfer of a business opportunity by a purchaser if the purchaser sells only one business opportunity in any twelve-month period;

(6) The not-for-profit sale of sales demonstration equipment, materials, or samples where the total cost does not exceed five hundred dollars;

(7) A marketing program made in conjunction with licensing of a registered trademark or service mark for which no consideration is paid. Any consideration paid in conjunction with the purchase of goods at a bona fide wholesale price does not constitute consideration under this subsection; or

(8) A transaction regulated pursuant to chapter 18.85 RCW.

[ 1981 c 155 s 4.]